Washington statutes.
RCW 19.280.010

Intent—Finding.

It is the intent of the legislature to encourage the development of new safe, clean, and reliable energy resources to meet demand in Washington for affordable and reliable electricity. To achieve this end, the legislature finds it essential that electric utilities in Washington develop comprehensive resource plans that explain the mix of generation and demand-side resources they plan to use to meet their customers' electricity needs in both the short term and the long term. The legislature intends that information obtained from integrated resource planning under this chapter will be used to assist in identifying and developing: (1) New energy generation; (2) conservation and efficiency resources; (3) methods, commercially available technologies, and facilities for integrating renewable resources, including addressing any overgeneration event; and (4) related infrastructure to meet the state's electricity needs.

[ 2013 c 149 s 1; 2006 c 195 s 1.]